New York, session 2025-2026, S1546.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public service law is amended by adding a new section 2 28 to read as follows: 3 § 28. New York power authority right of first offer and refusal. The 4 New York power authority, as established by title one of article five of 5 the public authorities law, shall be allowed to match the purchase price 6 of any renewable generation facility, renewable energy generation 7 project and any power or energy created by a renewable generation facil- 8 ity or renewable energy generation project, at the time of sale of such 9 facility or project. In the event that the authority decides to match 10 and offer such purchase price, within the timeframes provided in this 11 section, the authority shall assume the role of the sole purchaser of 12 the renewable generation facility, renewable energy generation project 13 or any power or energy created by a renewable generation facility or 14 renewable energy generation project. In the event that the authority 15 decided to exercise the right of first offer, it shall make such offer 16 within thirty days after the notice of sale for a renewable energy 17 generations project or renewable generation facility with a nameplate 18 capacity of less than twenty-five megawatts and within sixty days for a 19 renewable energy generation project or renewable generation facility 20 with a nameplate capacity larger than twenty-five megawatts. 21 § 2. Nothing in this act is intended to limit, impair, or affect the 22 legal authority of the power authority of the state of New York under 23 any other provision of title 1 of article 5 of the public authorities 24 law. 25 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04518-01-5